en: Fabric Starch
xx: Fabric Starch
cs: Škrob na textil
da: Tekstil – stivelse
de: Wäschestärke
es: Almidón para ropa
fr: Amidon pour textiles
it: Amido per tessuti
ja: 洗濯のり
nl: Stijfsel voor textiel
no: Tøystivelse
pl: Krochmal
pt: Goma para tecido
ru: Средства для накрахмаливания
sv: Textilstärkelse
tr: Kumaş Kolası

en: Garment Shields
xx: Garment Shields
cs: Vložky do oblečení
da: Stofimprægnering
de: Schweißabsorbierungspads
es: Protectores para la ropa
fr: Patchs anti-auréoles
it: Salva abiti
ja: 汗取りパッド
nl: Bloesbeschermers
no: Svettelapper
pl: Wkładki do odzieży pochłaniające pot
pt: Vestuário de proteção
ru: Подкладки для защиты одежды от пота
sv: Klädskydd
tr: Kıyafet Koruyucular

en: Iron Rests
xx: Iron Rests
cs: Stojánky a podložky pod žehličky
da: Strygejernsholdere
de: Bügeleisenhalter
es: Soportes para planchas
fr: Supports pour fers à repasser
it: Supporti per ferri
ja: アイロン置き台
nl: Strijkijzersteunen
no: Strykejernholdere
pl: Podstawki pod żelazka
pt: Apoio para ferro de passar
ru: Подставки для утюгов
sv: Järnrester
tr: Ütü Yerleştirme Platformu

en: Ironing Board Pads & Covers
xx: Ironing Board Pads & Covers
cs: Podložky a potahy na žehlicí prkna
da: Strygebrætbetræk
de: Bügelbrettunterlagen & -bezüge
es: Fundas para tablas de planchar
fr: Housses pour planches à repasser, Housse de table à repasser
it: Imbottiture e coperture assi da stiro
ja: アイロン台パッド・カバー
nl: Strijkplankhoezen
no: Matter og trekk for strykebrett
pl: Podkładki i pokrowce na deski do prasowania
pt: Almofadas e capas para mesas de passar roupas
ru: Чехлы для гладильных досок
sv: Överdrag och dynor för strykbräden
tr: Ütü Masası Sünger ve Örtüleri

en: Ironing Board Replacement Parts
xx: Ironing Board Replacement Parts
cs: Náhradní díly pro žehlicí prkna
da: Reservedele til strygebrætter
de: Ersatzteile für Bügeleisen
es: Recambios para tablas de planchar
fr: Pièces de rechange pour tables à repasser
it: Ricambi per tavole da stiro
ja: アイロン台交換部品
nl: Vervangende onderdelen voor strijkplanken
no: Reservedeler til strykebrett
pl: Części zamienne desek do prasowania
pt: Peças de reposição para tábua de passar
ru: Запчасти для гладильных досок
sv: Utbytbara delar för strykbrädor
tr: Ütü Masası Yedek Parçaları

en: Ironing Boards
xx: Ironing Boards
cs: Žehlicí prkna
da: Strygebrætter
de: Bügelbretter
es: Tablas de planchar
fr: Planches à repasser, Planche à repasser, Table à repasser
it: Assi da stiro
ja: アイロン台
nl: Strijkplanken
no: Strykebrett
pl: Deski do prasowania
pt: Tábuas de passar roupa
ru: Гладильные доски
sv: Strykbräden
tr: Ütü Masaları

en: Laundry Balls
xx: Laundry Balls
cs: Prací koule
da: Vaskebolde
de: Waschbälle
es: Ecobolas lavadora
fr: Balles de lavage
it: Palline per lavatrice
ja: 洗濯ボール
nl: Wasbollen
no: Vaskeballer
pl: Kule do prania
pt: Bolas de lavar roupa
ru: Шарики для стирки
sv: Tvättmaskinsbollar
tr: Çamaşır Makinesi Topları

en: Laundry Baskets
xx: Laundry Baskets
cs: Koše na prádlo
da: Vasketøjskurve
de: Wäschekörbe
es: Cestas para ropa
fr: Paniers à linge, Panier à linge
it: Cesti del bucato
ja: 洗濯カゴ
nl: Wasmanden
no: Vaskekurver
pl: Kosze do prania
pt: Cestos para lavanderia
ru: Корзины для белья
sv: Tvättkorgar
tr: Çamaşır Sepetleri

en: Laundry Detergent
xx: Laundry Detergent
cs: Prací prášky
da: Vaskepulver
de: Waschpulver
es: Detergente para ropa
fr: Lessive
it: Detergenti per lavanderia
ja: 洗濯洗剤
nl: Wasmiddel
no: Vaskemiddel
pl: Detergenty do prania
pt: Detergente para roupa
ru: Стиральные порошки
sv: Tvättmedel
tr: Çamaşır Deterjanı

en: Laundry Wash Bags & Frames
xx: Laundry Wash Bags & Frames
cs: Prací košíky a pytlíky
da: Vaskeposer og -kurve
de: Wäschesäcke & Waschkörbe
es: Cestas y bolsas de ropa
fr: Filets à linge et paniers de lavage
it: Retine lavaggio biancheria e portabiancheria
ja: 洗濯ネット・洗濯かご
nl: Waszakken en manden
no: Skittentøyssekker og -kurver
pl: Torebki i koszyki do prania
pt: Sacos e cestas para roupas
ru: Мешки и корзины для белья
sv: Tvättpåsar och korgar
tr: Çamaşır Torba ve Sepetleri

en: Lint Rollers
xx: Lint Rollers
cs: Válečky na šaty
da: Tekstilbørster
de: Fusselrollen
es: Rodillos antipelusas
fr: Brosses adhésives
it: Spazzole adesive
ja: ローラークリーナー
nl: Pluisverwijderaars
no: Loruller
pl: Rolki od ubrań
pt: Rolos papa-bolinhas
ru: Ролики для чистки одежды
sv: Klädvårdsrullar
tr: Tüy Toplayıcı Rulolar

en: Wrinkle Releasers & Anti-Static Sprays
xx: Wrinkle Releasers & Anti-Static Sprays
cs: Přípravky proti mačkání a antistatické spreje na tkaniny
da: Spray til fjernelse af folder og statisk elektricitet
de: Mittel gegen Falten & statische Aufladung
es: Espráis quita-arrugas y antiestáticos
fr: Sprays défroissants et antistatiques
it: Spray antistatici e antipiega
ja: しわ伸ばし・静電気防止スプレー
nl: Antikreukel- en antistatische sprays
no: Strykespray og antistatiske spraymidler
pl: Środki przeciw zagnieceniom i elektryzowaniu się
pt: Sprays antiestática e para tirar amassados
ru: Антистатики и средства для устранения складок
sv: Skrynkelmedel och antistatiska sprayer
tr: Kırışıklık Açıcılar ve Anti-Statik Spreyler

en: Moisture Absorbers
xx: Moisture Absorbers
cs: Pohlcovače vlhkosti
da: Fugtabsorbering
de: Trocknungsmittel
es: Absorbedores de humedad
fr: Absorbeurs d'humidité
it: Assorbitori di umidità
ja: 除湿剤
nl: Vochtvreters
no: Fuktighetsabsorberende produkter
pl: Pochłaniacze wilgoci
pt: Absorvedores de umidade
ru: Поглотители влаги
sv: Fuktabsorberare
tr: Nem Emiciler

en: Pest Control
xx: Pest Control
cs: Hubení škůdců
da: Skadedyrsbekæmpelse
de: Schädlingsbekämpfung
es: Control de plagas
fr: Désinsectisation
it: Controllo infestanti
ja: 害虫・ねずみ駆除
nl: Ongediertebestrijding
no: Skadedyrkontroll
pl: Dezynsekcja
pt: Controle de peste
ru: Борьба с вредителями
sv: Skadedjursbekämpning
tr: Haşere Kontrolü

en: Fly Swatters
xx: Fly Swatters
cs: Plácačky na mouchy
da: Fluesmækkere
de: Fliegenklatschen
es: Matamoscas
fr: Chasse-mouches
it: Palette per mosche
ja: ハエたたき
nl: Vliegenmeppers
no: Fluesmekkere
pl: Packi na muchy
pt: Mata-moscas
ru: Мухобойки
sv: Flugsmällor
tr: Sineklikler

en: Pest Control Traps
xx: Pest Control Traps
cs: Pasti na škůdce
da: Skadedyrsbekæmpelse – fælder
de: Fallen
es: Trampas para control de plagas
fr: Pièges à insectes
it: Trappole controllo infestanti
ja: 害虫捕獲用シート・罠
nl: Ongediertevallen
no: Skadedyrfeller
pl: Pułapki na szkodniki
pt: Armadilhas para controle de peste
ru: Ловушки для грызунов
sv: Skadedjursfällor
tr: Haşere Tuzakları

en: Pesticides
xx: Pesticides
cs: Pesticidy
da: Pesticider
de: Schädlingsbekämpfungsmittel
es: Pesticidas
fr: Pesticides, Déchets phytosanitaires ménagers produits chimiques
it: Pesticidi
ja: 殺虫剤
nl: Pesticiden
no: Skadedyrmidler
pl: Pestycydy
pt: Pesticidas
ru: Пестициды
sv: Bekämpningsmedel mot skadedjur
tr: Böcek İlaçları

en: Repellents
xx: Repellents
cs: Odpuzovače
da: Insektmiddel
de: Insektenschutz
es: Repelentes
fr: Répulsifs
it: Repellenti
ja: 防虫剤・虫よけ
nl: Insectenwerende middelen
no: Frastøtere
pl: Środki odstraszające
pt: Repelentes
ru: Репелленты
sv: Insektsmedel och djuravvisande medel
tr: Haşere Kovucular

en: Animal & Pet Repellents
xx: Animal & Pet Repellents
cs: Odpuzovače zvířat
da: Dyremiddel
de: Tierabwehr
es: Repelentes para animales
fr: Répulsifs à animaux
it: Repellenti per animali
ja: 忌避剤
nl: Dierenwerende middelen
no: Dyrefrastøtere
pl: Środki odstraszające zwierzęta
pt: Repelentes de animais
ru: Репелленты для животных
sv: Djuravvisande medel
tr: Hayvan Kovucular

en: Household Insect Repellents
xx: Household Insect Repellents
cs: Odpuzovače domácího hmyzu
da: Indendørs insektmiddel
de: Mittel gegen Haushaltsinsekten
es: Repelentes de insectos para el hogar
fr: Répulsifs à insectes pour la maison
it: Repellenti domestici per insetti
ja: 家庭用虫よけ
nl: Huishoudelijke insectenwerende middelen
no: Insektmidler
pl: Domowe odstraszacze insektów
pt: Repelentes de insetos domésticos
ru: Бытовые репелленты от насекомых
sv: Insektsmedel
tr: Ev Haşeresi Kovucular